Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2467
Bonds; issuance; terms; signatures.

Bonds shall be authorized by resolution of the issuing agency's board and may be issued under a resolution or under a trust indenture or other security instrument in one or more series and shall bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times, bear interest at such rate or rates, be in such denomination or denominations, be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such conversion or registration privileges, have such rank or priority, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of redemption, with or without premium, as such resolution, trust indenture, or other security instrument may provide, and without limitation by the provisions of any other law limiting amounts, maturities, or interest rates. Any officer authorized or designated to sign, countersign, execute, or attest any bond or any coupon may utilize a facsimile signature in lieu of his or her manual signature.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 67.